src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-huuryg_gt-norm.yaml
# Author: Csilla HORVATH (Szeged Team)

Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - хӯрыг: # "(eng) sack/(hun) zsák/(rus) мешок" - full paradigm

    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Nom: хӯрыг
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Loc: хӯрыгт
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Lat: хӯрыгн
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Abl: хӯрыгныл
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Ins: хӯргыл
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Tra: хӯргыг

    хӯрыг+N+Du+Nom: хӯргыг
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Loc: хӯргыгт
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Lat: хӯргыгн
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Abl: хӯргыгныл
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Ins: хӯргыгтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Nom: хӯргыт
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Loc: хӯргытт
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Lat: хӯргытн
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Abl: хӯргытныл
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Ins: хӯргытыл

    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: хӯргум
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хӯргумт
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: хӯргумн
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хӯргумныл
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: хӯргумтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: хӯргагум
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Loc+PxSg1: хӯргагумт
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Lat+PxSg1: хӯргагумн
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Abl+PxSg1: хӯргагумныл
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Ins+PxSg1: хӯргагумтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: хӯрганум
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: хӯрганумт
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: хӯрганумн
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: хӯрганумныл
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: хӯрганумтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хӯргын
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хӯргынт
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2: хӯргынн
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хӯргынныл
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: хӯргынтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [хӯргагын, хӯргагн]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Loc+PxSg2: хӯргагынт
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Lat+PxSg2: хӯргагынн
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Abl+PxSg2: хӯргагынныл
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Ins+PxSg2: хӯргагынтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [хӯрган, хӯрганын]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [хӯргант, хӯрганынт]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2: [хӯрганн, хӯрганынн]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [хӯрганныл, хӯрганынныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: [хӯргантыл, хӯрганынтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хӯрге
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хӯргет
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: хӯрген
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хӯргеныл
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: хӯргетыл

    хӯрыг+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хӯргаге
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Loc+PxSg3: хӯргагет
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Lat+PxSg3: хӯргаген
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Abl+PxSg3: хӯргагеныл
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Ins+PxSg3: хӯргагетыл

    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хӯрганэ
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хӯрганэт
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3: хӯрганэн
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хӯрганэныл
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: хӯрганэтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [хӯргумен, хӯргуме̄н]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [хӯргумент, хӯргуме̄нт]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu1: [хӯргуменн, хӯргуме̄нн]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [хӯргуменныл, хӯргуме̄нныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu1: [хӯргументыл, хӯргуме̄нтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [хӯргагумен, хӯргагуме̄н]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Loc+PxDu1: [хӯргагумент, хӯргагуме̄нт]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Lat+PxDu1: [хӯргагумент, хӯргагуме̄нт]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Abl+PxDu1: [хӯргагуменныл, хӯргагуме̄нныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Ins+PxDu1: [хӯргагументыл, хӯргагуме̄нтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: [хӯрганумен, хӯргануме̄н]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [хӯрганумент, хӯргануме̄нт]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu1: [хӯргануменн, хӯргануме̄нн]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [хӯргануменныл, хӯргануме̄нныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu1: [хӯрганументыл, хӯргануме̄нтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [хӯргын, хӯргы̄н]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [хӯргынт, хӯргы̄нт]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu2: [хӯргынн, хӯргы̄нн]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [хӯргынныл, хӯргы̄нныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu2: [хӯргынтыл, хӯргы̄нтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [хӯргагын, хӯргагы̄н]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Loc+PxDu2: [хӯргагынт, хӯргагы̄нт]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Lat+PxDu2: [хӯргагынн, хӯргагы̄нн]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Abl+PxDu2: [хӯргагынныл, хӯргагы̄нныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Ins+PxDu2: [хӯргагынтыл, хӯргагы̄нтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: [хӯрганын, хӯрганы̄н, хӯрган]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [хӯрганынт, хӯрганы̄нт, хӯргант]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu2: [хӯрганынн, хӯрганы̄нн, хӯрганн]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [хӯрганынныл, хӯрганы̄нныл, хӯрганныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu2: [хӯрганынтыл, хӯрганы̄нтыл, хӯргантыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [хӯрген, хӯрге̄н]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [хӯргент, хӯрге̄нт]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu3: [хӯргенн, хӯрге̄нн]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [хӯргенныл, хӯрге̄нныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu3: [хӯргентыл, хӯрге̄нтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [хӯргаген, хӯргаге̄н]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Loc+PxDu3: [хӯргагент, хӯргаге̄нт]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Lat+PxDu3: [хӯргагенн, хӯргаге̄нн]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Abl+PxDu3: [хӯргагенныл, хӯргаге̄нныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Ins+PxDu3: [хӯргагентыл, хӯргаге̄нтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: [хӯрганэн, хӯрганэ̄н]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [хӯрганэнт, хӯрганэ̄нт]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu3: [хӯрганэнн, хӯрганэ̄нн]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [хӯрганэнныл, хӯрганэ̄нныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu3: [хӯрганэнтыл, хӯрганэ̄нтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: хӯргув
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хӯргувт
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl1: хӯргувн
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хӯргувныл
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: хӯргувтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хӯргагув
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Loc+PxPl1: хӯргагувт
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Lat+PxPl1: хӯргагувн
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Abl+PxPl1: хӯргагувныл
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Ins+PxPl1: хӯргагувтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хӯрганув
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хӯрганувт
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl1: хӯрганувн
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хӯрганувныл
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: хӯрганувтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [хӯргын, хӯргы̄н]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [хӯргынт, хӯргынт]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl2: [хӯргынн, хӯргынн]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [хӯргынныл, хӯргынныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [хӯргынтыл, хӯргынтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [хӯргагын, хӯргагы̄н]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Loc+PxPl2: [хӯргагынт, хӯргагы̄нт]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Lat+PxPl2: [хӯргагынн, хӯргагы̄нн]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Abl+PxPl2: [хӯргагынныл, хӯргагы̄нныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Ins+PxPl2: [хӯргагынтыл, хӯргагы̄нтыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [хӯрганын, хӯрганы̄н, хӯрган]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [хӯрганынт, хӯрганы̄нт, хӯргант]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl2: [хӯрганынн, хӯрганы̄нн, хӯрганн]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [хӯрганынныл, хӯрганы̄нныл, хӯрганныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: [хӯрганынтыл, хӯрганы̄нтыл, хӯргантыл]

    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хӯрганыл
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хӯрганылт
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl3: хӯрганылн
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хӯрганылныл
    хӯрыг+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: хӯрганылтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хӯргаганыл
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Loc+PxPl3: хӯргаганылт
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Lat+PxPl3: хӯргаганылн
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Abl+PxPl3: хӯргаганылныл
    хӯрыг+N+Du+Ins+PxPl3: хӯргаганылтыл

    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [хӯрганыл, хӯргананыл]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [хӯрганылт, хӯргананылт]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl3: [хӯрганылн, хӯргананылн]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [хӯрганылныл, хӯргананылныл]
    хӯрыг+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: [хӯрганылтыл, хӯргананылтыл]
